Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB621.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 157.220 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Education is hereby designated as the agency for cooperation
with the state and federal government agencies, the nonpublic school programs and
local schools of Kentucky in carrying out the provisions of KRS 157.200 to
157.290[157.280].
(2) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate[make] necessary
administrative[rules and] regulations in accordance[keeping] with[ the provisions
of] KRS 157.200 to 157.290[157.280 for their proper administration], including but
not limited to establishment of classes, eligibility and admission of pupils,[ the]
curriculum, class size and caseload limitations in accordance with subsection (3)
of this section, housing, special equipment, and instructional supplies.
(3) In providing special education services for the exceptional children and youth
specified in subsection (3)(a) to (m) of Section 2 of this Act:
(a) The maximum class size for special classes for students with the following
conditions shall be limited to:
1. Eight (8) students with autism;
2. Ten (10) students with a developmental delay;
3. Eight (8) students with an emotional-behavioral disability;
4. Ten (10) students with a functional mental disability;
5. Six (6) students with a hearing impairment;
6. Fifteen (15) students with a mild mental disability;
7. Ten (10) students with multiple disabilities;
8. Sixteen (16) students with an orthopedic impairment;
9. Sixteen (16) students with an other health impairment;
10. Ten (10) students in kindergarten to grade five (5) and fifteen (15)
Page 1 of 14
HB062110.100 - 1739 - XXXX 3/12/2026 2:34 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 621/GA
students in grades six (6) to twelve (12) with a specific learning
disability; and
11. Ten (10) students with a visual disability;
(b) The maximum caseloads for teachers of special classes shall be as follows:
1. Fifteen (15) students with autism;
2. Fifteen (15) students with a developmental delay;
3. Fifteen (15) students with an emotional-behavioral disability;
4. Ten (10) students with a functional mental disability;
5. Eight (8) students with a hearing impairment;
6. Fifteen (15) students in kindergarten to grade five (5) and twenty (20)
students in grades six (6) to twelve (12) with a mild mental disability;
7. Ten (10) students with multiple disabilities;
8. Twenty (20) students with an orthopedic impairment;
9. Twenty (20) students with an other health impairment;
10. Fifteen (15) students in kindergarten to grade five (5) and twenty (20)
students in grades six (6) to twelve (12) with a specific learning
disability; and
11. Ten (10) students with a visual disability;
(c) For speech-language pathologists the caseload limitations in KRS 334A.190
shall apply;
(d) Special classes containing more than one (1) disability category shall use
the category of the majority of students in the class to determine the
maximum class size established in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(e) Two (2) students above the maximum class size established in paragraph (a)
of this subsection may be added to a class if a paraprofessional is present;
(f) If a teacher of exceptional children and youth provides services through the
collaborative model, the maximum caseload shall not exceed twenty (20)
Page 2 of 14
HB062110.100 - 1739 - XXXX 3/12/2026 2:34 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 621/GA
students in grades six (6) to twelve (12) and fifteen (15) students in
kindergarten to grade five (5);
(g) If a teacher of exceptional children provides services through a
combination of collaboration and special classes, the maximum caseload
shall not exceed those established in paragraph (b) of this subsection;
(h) Teachers of special classes who are assigned student records of more than
one (1) disability category shall use the category of the majority of students
on the caseload to determine the maximum caseload established in
paragraph (b) of this subsection; and
(i) State preschool caseload and class size maximums shall be maintained
pursuant to Section 4 of this Act.
(4)[(2)] The Department of Education is authorized to receive contributions and
donations that may be made to carry out[ the provisions and requirements of] KRS
157.200 to 157.290[157.280].
(5)[(3)] Local supervision of special educational facilities for exceptional children and
youth shall be approved by the Department of Education according to
administrative[rules and] regulations promulgated[approved] by the Kentucky
Board of Education.
Section 2. KRS 157.200 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 157.200 to 157.290:
(1) "Admissions and release committee" or "ARC" means a group of individuals
that is responsible for developing, reviewing, or revising an individualized
education program for an exceptional child or youth;
(2) "Caseload" means the number of exceptional children and youth assigned to a
teacher of exceptional children and youth for the purpose of overseeing the
management of individualized specially designed instruction and related services
as required by the individualized education program;
Page 3 of 14
HB062110.100 - 1739 - XXXX 3/12/2026 2:34 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 621/GA
(3) "Exceptional children and youth" means persons under twenty-one (21) years of
age who differ in one (1) or more respects from same-age peers in physical, mental,
learning, emotional, or social characteristics and abilities to such a degree that they
need special educational programs or services for them to benefit from the regular
or usual facilities or educational programs of the public schools in the districts in
which they reside. The Department of Education, through administrative
regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Board of Education, shall interpret the
statutory definitions of exceptionality. An exceptionality is any trait so defined in
this section or by administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Board of
Education. Requirements of average daily attendance for exceptional classes shall
be regulated by statute, or in the absence of direction by administrative regulations
promulgated by the Kentucky Board of Education. Categories of exceptionalities
included within, but not limited by, this definition are as follows:
(a) "Orthopedic impairment" means a severe physical impairment of bone or
muscle which adversely affects educational performance to the extent that
specially designed instruction is required for the pupil to benefit from
education. The term includes physical impairments caused by congenital
anomaly, disease, and from other causes;
(b) "Other health impairment[impaired]" means limited strength, vitality, or
alertness, including a heightened alertness to environmental stimuli, due to a
chronic or acute health problem which adversely affects educational
performance to the extent that specially designed instruction is required for
the pupil to benefit from education. Chronic health problems may include, but
are not be limited to, a heart condition, tuberculosis, sickle cell anemia,
hemophilia, epilepsy, rheumatic fever, nephritis, asthma, lead poisoning,
leukemia, diabetes, attention deficit disorder, attention deficit hyperactive
disorder, or acquired immune deficiency syndrome;
Page 4 of 14
HB062110.100 - 1739 - XXXX 3/12/2026 2:34 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 621/GA
(c) "Speech or language impairment" means a communication disorder such as
stuttering, impaired articulation, impaired language, impaired voice, delayed
acquisition of language, or absence of language that adversely affects
educational performance to the extent that specially designed instruction is
required for the pupil to benefit from education;
(d) "Hearing impairment" means a physiological hearing loss:
1. Ranging from mild to profound, which is either permanent or
fluctuating, and of such a degree that the pupil is impaired in the
processing of linguistic information via the auditory channel either with
or without amplification; or
2. That adversely affects educational performance so that specially
designed instruction is required for the child or youth to benefit from
education.
The term shall include both deaf and hard of hearing children;
(e) "Mental disability" means a deficit or delay in intellectual and adaptive
behavior functioning, which adversely affects educational performance to the
extent that specially designed instruction is required for the pupil to benefit
from education, and which is typically manifested during the developmental
period;
(f) "Specific learning disability" means a disorder in one (1) or more of the
psychological processes primarily involved in understanding or using spoken
or written language, which selectively and significantly interferes with the
acquisition, integration, or application of listening, speaking, reading, writing,
reasoning, or mathematical abilities. "Specific learning disability" may
include conditions such as dyslexia, dyscalculia, dysgraphia, developmental
aphasia, or perceptual motor disabilities. The disorder is lifelong, intrinsic to
the individual, and adversely affects educational performance to the extent
Page 5 of 14
HB062110.100 - 1739 - XXXX 3/12/2026 2:34 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 621/GA
that specially designed instruction is required in order for the pupil to benefit
from education. Determination of the existence of a specific learning
disability shall include documentation that a child does not make sufficient
progress in meeting age or grade-level content standards when provided with
appropriate instruction and learning experiences delivered by qualified
personnel, including the child's response to scientific, research-based
interventions and additional information derived from an individual
evaluation. The term does not include a learning problem which is primarily
the result of:
1. A hearing impairment;
2. Visual, physical, mental, or emotional-behavioral disabilities;
3. Environmental, cultural, or economic differences; or
4. Limited English proficiency;
(g) "Emotional-behavioral disability" means a condition characterized by
behavioral excess or deficit which significantly interferes with a pupil's
interpersonal relationships or learning process to the extent that it adversely
affects educational performance so that specially designed instruction is
required in order for the pupil to benefit from education;
(h) "Multiple disability" means a combination of two (2) or more disabilities
resulting in significant learning, developmental, or behavioral and emotional
problems, which adversely affects educational performance and, therefore,
requires specially designed instruction in order for the pupil to benefit from
education. A pupil is not considered to have a multiple disability if the
adverse effect on educational performance is solely the result of deaf-
blindness or the result of speech or language disability and one (1) other
disabling condition;
(i) "Deaf-blind" means auditory and visual impairments, the combination of
Page 6 of 14
HB062110.100 - 1739 - XXXX 3/12/2026 2:34 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 621/GA
which creates such severe communication and other developmental and
learning needs that the pupil cannot be appropriately educated in special
education programs designed solely for pupils with hearing impairments,
visual impairments, or severe disabilities, unless supplementary assistance is
provided to address educational needs resulting from the two (2) disabilities;
(j) "Visually disabled" means a visual impairment, which, even with correction,
adversely affects educational performance to the extent that specially
designed instruction is required for the pupil to benefit from education. The
term includes both partially seeing and blind pupils;
(k) "Developmental delay" means a significant discrepancy between a child's
current level of performance in basic skills such as cognition, language or
communication, self-help, social-emotional, or fine or gross motor, and the
expected level of performance for that age. The term shall be used only with
children ages three (3) through eight (8);
(l) "Traumatic brain injury" means an acquired impairment to the neurological
system resulting from an insult to the brain which adversely affects
educational performance and causes temporary or permanent and partial or
complete loss of:
1. Cognitive functioning;
2. Physical ability; or
3. Communication or social-behavioral interaction.
The term does not include a brain injury that is congenital or degenerative, or
a brain injury induced by birth trauma;
(m) "Autism" means a developmental disability significantly affecting verbal and
nonverbal communication and social interaction, generally evident before age
three (3), that adversely affects educational performance. Characteristics of
autism include:
Page 7 of 14
HB062110.100 - 1739 - XXXX 3/12/2026 2:34 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 621/GA
1. Engagement in repetitive activity and stereotyped movement;
2. Resistance to environmental change or change in daily routine; and
3. Unusual responses to sensory experience.
The term does not include children with characteristics of an emotional-
behavioral disability; and
(n) "Gifted and talented student" means a pupil identified as possessing
demonstrated or potential ability to perform at an exceptionally high level in
general intellectual aptitude, specific academic aptitude, creative or divergent
thinking, psychosocial or leadership skills, or in the visual or performing
arts;[.
(2) "Special education" means specially designed instruction to meet the unique needs
of an exceptional child or youth.
(3) "Special educational facilities" means physical facilities designed or adapted to
meet the needs of exceptional children and youth, and approved according to
regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Board of Education.]
(4) "Related services" means transportation and the developmental, corrective, and
other supportive services required to assist an exceptional child or youth to benefit
from special education, and may include, but are not limited to, speech-language
pathology and audiology services; psychological services; physical and
occupational therapy; recreation, including therapeutic recreation; early
identification and assessment of disabilities; counseling services, including
rehabilitation counseling; orientation and mobility services; medical services for
diagnostic or evaluation purposes; school health services; social work services in
schools; and parent counseling and training;[.]
(5) "Special classes" means specially equipped and staffed classes in which an
exceptional child or youth, individually or in small groups, spends part of his or
her day receiving specially designed instruction or related services as determined
Page 8 of 14
HB062110.100 - 1739 - XXXX 3/12/2026 2:34 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 621/GA
by the ARC;
(6) "Special education" means specially designed instruction to meet the unique
needs of an exceptional child or youth;
(7) "Special educational facilities" means physical facilities designed or adapted to
meet the needs of exceptional children and youth, and approved according to
administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Board of Education; and
(8)[(5)] "Transition services" means a coordinated set of activities for a pupil designed
within an outcome-oriented process, that promotes movement from school to
postschool activities. The term includes:
(a) Postsecondary education;
(b) Vocational training; and
(c) Integrated employment, including supported employment, continuing and
adult education, adult services, independent living, or community
participation.
The coordinated set of activities shall be based on the individual pupil's needs,
taking into account the pupil's preferences and interests, and shall include
instruction, community experience, the development of employment, and other
postschool adult living objectives, and, if appropriate, acquisition of daily living
skills and functional vocational evaluation.
Section 3. KRS 157.230 is amended to read as follows:
School boards of any school district subject to[ the provisions of] KRS 157.200 to
157.290[157.280], shall establish and maintain special educational programs for
exceptional children and youth who are residents of their school district, or contract for
programs as may be authorized by KRS 157.280.
Section 4. KRS 157.3175 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each local school district shall ensure that a developmentally appropriate half-day
preschool education program is provided for each child who is at risk of educational
Page 9 of 14
HB062110.100 - 1739 - XXXX 3/12/2026 2:34 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 621/GA
failure and who is four (4) years of age[:
(a) By October 1, for any year prior to 2017; or
(b) ] by August 1[, for 2017 or any year thereafter].
All other four (4) year old children shall be served to the extent placements are
available. The Kentucky Board of Education, upon the recommendation of the chief
state school officer, shall adopt administrative regulations establishing the
guidelines for the program. Administrative regulations shall establish eligibility
criteria, program guidelines, and standards for personnel.
(2) "Developmentally appropriate preschool program" means a program which focuses
on the physical, intellectual, social, and emotional development of young children.
The preschool program shall help children with their interpersonal and socialization
skills.
(3) Funds appropriated by the General Assembly for the preschool education programs
shall be granted to local school districts according to a grant allotment system
approved by the Kentucky Board of Education. Children who are at risk shall be
identified based on the Federal School Lunch Program eligibility criteria for free
lunch. Appropriations shall be separate from all other funds appropriated to the
Department of Education and shall be administered in accordance with applicable
federal and state statutes and administrative regulations. Eligible local school
districts shall receive funds based on the average number of preschool children
being served on December 1 and March 1 of the prior academic year who are
appropriately identified as:
(a) Three (3) and four (4) years of age with disabilities; and
(b) Four (4) years of age identified as at risk of educational failure.
Local school districts may develop cooperative arrangements with other school
districts or organizations in accordance with KRS 157.280.
(4) A child shall be eligible for a free and appropriate preschool education and related
Page 10 of 14
HB062110.100 - 1739 - XXXX 3/12/2026 2:34 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 621/GA
services if:
(a) 1. The child has been identified as a child with a disability in accordance
with the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C.
sec.[secs.] 1400 et seq.; or
2. The child has been identified in accordance with the definitions and
procedures for exceptional children and youth in accordance with KRS
157.200(3)[(1)](a) to (m); and
(b) The child is three (3) or four (4) years of age[:
1. By October 1, for any year before 2017; or
2. ] by August 1[, for 2017 or any year thereafter].
(5) The chief state school officer shall receive and review proposals from local school
districts for grants to operate or oversee the operation of developmentally
appropriate preschool education programs. Districts may submit proposals for
implementing new services, enhancing existing preschool education services, or
contracting for services. In designing a local early childhood education program,
each district shall work with existing preschool programs to avoid duplication of
programs and services, to avoid supplanting federal funds, and to maximize Head
Start funds in order to serve as many four (4) year old children as possible.
(6) Each program proposal shall include, at a minimum:
(a) A description of the process conducted by the district to ensure that the
parents or guardians of all eligible participants have been made aware of the
program and of their right to participate;
(b) A description of the planned educational programming and related services;
(c) The estimated number of children participating in the program;
(d) Strategies for involving children with disabilities;
(e) Estimated ratio of staff to children with the maximum being one (1) adult for
each ten (10) children;
Page 11 of 14
HB062110.100 - 1739 - XXXX 3/12/2026 2:34 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 621/GA
(f) The estimated percentage of children participating in the program who are at
risk of educational failure;
(g) Information on the training and qualifications of program staff and
documentation that the staff meet required standards;
(h) A budget and per-child expenditure estimate;
(i) A plan to facilitate active parental involvement in the preschool program,
including provisions for complementary parent education when appropriate;
(j) Facilities and equipment which are appropriate for young children;
(k) The days of the week and hours of a day during which the program shall
operate;
(l) A plan for coordinating the program with existing medical and social services,
including a child development and health screening component;
(m) Assurances that participants shall receive breakfast or lunch;
(n) Program sites which meet state and local licensure requirements;
(o) A plan for coordinating program philosophy and activities with the local
district's primary school program;
(p) An evaluation component; and
(q) Certification from the local Head Start director that the Head Start program is
fully utilized pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.
(7) If the superintendent and local Head Start director are unable to reach an agreement
on whether a Head Start program is fully utilized, the superintendent or local Head
Start director shall notify the chief state school officer. The local Head Start director
shall provide the chief state school officer all information relevant to the utilization
of the Head Start program. Within thirty (30) days of notification from the
superintendent or local Head Start director, the chief state school officer shall make
a determination of whether a Head Start program is fully utilized and may execute
the certification required by subsection (6)(q) of this section on behalf of the local
Page 12 of 14
HB062110.100 - 1739 - XXXX 3/12/2026 2:34 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 621/GA
Head Start director.
(8) Programs shall reflect an equitable geographic distribution representative of all
areas of the Commonwealth.
Section 5. KRS 159.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any parent, guardian, or custodian who intentionally fails to comply with the
requirements of KRS 159.010 to 159.170, except as provided in subsection (5) of
this section, shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense, and two
hundred fifty dollars ($250) for the second offense. Each subsequent offense shall
be classified as a Class B misdemeanor. A new offense shall not be constituted until
any previous offense has been finally adjudicated. The court trying the case may
suspend enforcement of the fine if the child is immediately placed in attendance at a
school, and may finally remit the fine if the attendance continues regularly for the
full school term. School attendance may be proved by an attested certificate of the
principal or teacher in charge of the school.
(2) Any principal, teacher, director of pupil personnel, assistant director of pupil
personnel, or other school officer who intentionally fails to comply with the
provisions of KRS 159.010 to 159.250, or of KRS 160.330 shall be fined not less
than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than fifty dollars ($50). Upon conviction
under this subsection, a director of pupil personnel or assistant director of pupil
personnel shall be removed from office and have his certificate revoked, and a
principal, teacher, or other school officer may have his certificate revoked.
(3) Any person, other than those persons mentioned in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section, who fails to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter relating to
compulsory attendance, or who violates any of the provisions of KRS 159.130,
shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than two hundred dollars
($200), or imprisoned in the county jail for not more than sixty (60) days, or both.
(4) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 159.270 shall be liable to a
Page 13 of 14
HB062110.100 - 1739 - XXXX 3/12/2026 2:34 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 621/GA
fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) and shall be liable to the punishment
prescribed by law for the crime of false swearing. If he is an officer, he shall be
removed from office; and if he is a director of pupil personnel, his certificate shall
be revoked.
(5) Any of the following who intentionally fails to comply with the requirements of
KRS 159.150 shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense and two
hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each subsequent offense:
(a) A student enrolled in a public school who has attained the age of eighteen (18)
years, but who has not yet reached his or her twenty-first birthday, for whom a
guardian has not been appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction, whether
or not that student is identified as an exceptional child or youth under KRS
157.200(3)[(1)](a) to (m);
(b) A parent, guardian, or custodian of a student enrolled in a public school who
has not reached his or her eighteenth birthday; or
(c) A guardian appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction of a student who is
enrolled in a public school, has been identified as an exceptional child or
youth under KRS 157.200(3)[(1)](a) to (m), and has attained the age of
eighteen (18) years, but who has not yet reached his or her twenty-first
birthday.
Any person described in paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection shall be
informed by personnel of the local school district that a public school student who
has not reached his or her twenty-first birthday shall be subject to truancy laws.
(6) All fines imposed and all sums required to be paid as penalties under this section
shall, after payment of the costs of prosecution and recovery thereof, be paid into
the treasury of the district board of education and become a part of the school fund
of the district.
Page 14 of 14
HB062110.100 - 1739 - XXXX 3/12/2026 2:34 PM GA